en: red fruit, red fruits
bg: червени плодове
de: rote Früchte
es: frutos rojos
fr: Fruits rouges, fruit rouge
hr: crveno voće
it: frutti rossi
nl: rode vruchten
pt: frutas vermelhas

en: berries, berry
da: Bær
de: Beere
es: bayas
fi: marja, marjat, marjoja
fr: baies, baie
he: פירות יער
hr: bobičasto voće
hu: bogyó, bogyótermés, bogyós gyümölcs
it: Bacche
ja: ベリーズ
lv: ogas
nb: bær
nl: bessen
pl: Owoce jagodowe
pt: Bagas
ru: Ягоды
sv: Bär

en: forest berries
ca: Fruits de bosc
es: frutas del bosque
fr: fruits des bois
hr: šumsko voće
it: frutti di bosco, bacche di bosco
nl: bosvruchten
pl: owoce leśne, owoców leśnych

en: forest berries paste
hr: pasta od šumskog-voća
it: pasta di frutti di bosco

en: berry blend, berry mix
de: Beerenmischung
fi: marjaseos
fr: mélange de fruits rouges
hr: mješavina bobičastog voća
it: miscela di bacche
sv: bärblandning

en: seed and berry mix
de: Samen und Beeren Mix
fi: siemen-marjaseos
fr: Mélange de graines et de baies
hr: mješavina sjemenki i bobica
it: miscela di semi e bacche
sv: frö-bärblandning

en: Fruits and nuts, nuts and fruits, fruits & nuts, nuts & fruits
fr: fruits et noix, noix et fruits, fruits & noix, noix et fruits
it: frutta e noci

en: fruits and vegetables, vegetables and fruits
fr: fruits et légumes, légumes et fruits
hr: voće i povrće
it: frutta e verdura
pl: owoce i warzywa, warzywa i owoce

en: berry preparation
de: Fruchtzubereitung aus roten Früchten
fi: marjavalmiste
fr: préparation de fruits rouges
hr: priprema bobičastog voća
it: preparazione di bacche
sv: bärsprodukt

fr: fruits confits
de: Früchte kandiert
es: frutas confitadas
fi: kandeeratut hedelmät
it: frutta candita

en: exotic fruit
da: eksotisk frugt
fi: eksoottiset hedelmät
fr: fruit exotique, fruits exotiques

en: fruit and vegetable concentrate, fruit and vegetable concentrates, vegetable and fruit concentrates
da: frugt- og grøntsagskoncentrat, frugt- og grøntsagskoncentrater
de: Obst- und Gemüsekonzentrate
es: concentrados de frutas y vegetales
fi: hedelmä- ja kasvistiivisteet, kasvis- ja hedelmätiivisteet
fr: fruits et légumes concentrés, concentrés de fruits et de légumes
it: concentrati di frutta e verdura
nl: groente- en fruitconcentraten
pt: Concentrado de frutas e vegetais
sv: frukt- och grönsakskoncentrat, frukt och grönsaks koncentrat

en: dried fruit, dried fruits
ca: fruita seca
de: Trockenfrüchte, getrocknete Früchte
es: frutas secas, otras frutas secas
fi: kuivatut hedelmät
fr: fruits séchés, fruits secs, autres fruits secs
hr: sušeno voće
it: frutta secca
ja: ドライフルーツ
nl: gedroogd fruit
pl: owoce suszone, suszone owoce, owoców suszonych

en: juice
bg: сок
de: Saft
es: zumo, jugo
fi: mehu
fr: jus
hr: sok
it: succo
lv: sula
nl: sap
pl: sok, soki, soku, soków
pt: suco, sumo
ru: сок
sv: saft, juice

en: concentrated juice
de: konzentrierter Saft
es: Zumo a partir de concentrado, jugo a partir de concentrado, zumo concentrado, jugo concentrado
fi: mehutiiviste
fr: jus concentré
hr: koncentrirani sok
it: succo concentrato
ja: 濃縮果汁
lt: sulčių koncentratas, koncentruotos sultys
nl: sap uit vruchtensapconcentraat, geconcentreerd sap
pl: zagęszczony sok, sok zagęszczony, koncentrat soku, koncentrat soku z, zagęszczone soki
ru: концентрированные соки

en: fruit juice
bg: сок от плодове
ca: Suc de fruita
cs: Ovocná šťáva
da: Frugtjuice
de: Fruchtsaft
es: zumo de frutas, jugo de frutas
fi: hedelmämehu
fr: jus de fruits
he: מיץ פירות
hr: voćni soka, soka miješanog voća
hu: gyümölcslé
it: succhi di frutta
ja: 果汁
lv: augļu sula
nb: fruktjuice
nl: vruchtensap, vruchtensappen
pl: Sok owocowy, soki owocowe
pt: Suco de fruta, sumo de fruta
ro: Suc de fructe
ru: Фруктовый сок
sv: Fruktjuice
uk: Фруктовий сік

en: berry juice
pl: sok z jagód, soku z jagód, sok jagodowy

en: fruit juice concentrate
bg: концентрат от плодов сок
ca: concentrat de suc de fruites
cs: ovocný koncentrát, koncentrát ovocné šťávy
da: Frugtjuicekoncentrat
de: Fruchtsaftkonzentrat, Fruchtsäfte Konzentrat
es: Jugo de frutas concentrado
fi: hedelmämehutiiviste
fr: jus concentré de fruits, jus de fruits concentrés
he: תרכיז מיץ פרות, תרכיז מיץ פירות, תרכיז מיצי פירות
hr: koncentrirani voćni sok
hu: gyümölcslé-koncentrátum, sűrített gyümölcslé
it: Concentrato di succo di frutta
nl: vruchtensapconcentraat
pl: Koncentrat soku owocowego, zagęszczone soki owocowe
pt: concentrado de sumo de fruta, concentrado de suco de fruta
ro: concentrat de suc de fructe
ru: Концентрат фруктового сока
sk: koncentrát ovocnej šťavy
sv: fruktjuicekoncentrat

en: fruit juice from concentrate, fruit juices from concentrate
de: Fruchtsaft auf Konzentrat Basis, Fruchtsaft aus Fruchtsaftkonzentrat, Fruchtsaft aus Fruchtsaftkonzentraten, Fruchtsäfte aus Konzentraten
es: zumo de frutas a partir de concentrado, jugo de frutas a partir de concentrado, zumo de frutas procedente de concentrado, jugo de frutas procedente de concentrado
fi: hedelmämehu tiivisteestä, hedelmämehut tiivisteestä, tiivisteestä valmistetut täysmehut
fr: jus de fruits à base de concentré, jus de fruits à base de concentrés, jus de fruits à base de jus concentrés
hr: vočni sok iz koncentrata, voćnog soka od koncentriranog soka, soka više vrsta voća od koncentriranog soka
it: succhi di frutta a base di concentrato, succhi di frutta a base di concentrati
nl: vruchtsap van concentraat, vruchtensap uit concentraat
pl: sok owocowy z koncentratu, soki owocowe z koncentratu, sok owocowy z koncentratu z, soki z soków zagęszczonych, soki z zagęszczonych soków, soki owocowe z zagęszczonych soków owocowych
sv: fruktjuice från koncentrat, juicer framställd av koncentrat, juice från koncentrat, frukt juice från koncentrat

fr: purée de fruits, purées de fruits
de: Fruchtmark
fi: hedelmäpyree
it: popa di frutti
pl: przecier owocowy, przecier z owoców
pt: puré de fruta, puré de frutas, puré de fruto, puré de frutos